Utah statutes.
17B-2a-205.   Additional drainage district powers.
In addition to the powers conferred on a drainage district under Section
17B-1-103, a drainage district may:
(1)  enter upon land for the purpose of examining the land or making a survey;
(2)  locate a necessary drainage canal with any necessary branches on land
that the district's board of trustees considers best;
(3)  issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local
District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district;
(4)  after the payment or tender of compensation allowed, go upon land to
construct proposed works, and thereafter enter upon that land to maintain or
repair the works;
(5)  appropriate water for useful and beneficial purposes;
(6)  regulate and control, for the benefit of landholders within the district,
all water developed, appropriated, or owned by the district;
(7)  appropriate, use, purchase, develop, sell, and convey water and water
rights in the same manner and for the same use and purposes as a private
person;
(8)  widen, straighten, deepen, enlarge, or remove any obstruction or rubbish
from any watercourse, whether inside or outside the district; and
(9)  if necessary, straighten a watercourse by cutting a new channel upon land
not already containing the watercourse, subject to the landowner receiving
compensation for the land occupied by the new channel and for any damages, as
provided under the law of eminent domain.
